bbl_nouns_formation.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NOUNS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

Nouns_Abs
Nouns_Obl[-o_stem,-u_stem,-human] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-human]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Obl[-o_stem,-u_stem,human] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-nonhuman]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
(Nouns_Obl[o_stem] | Nouns_Obl[u_stem]) [:uj] [>:>] Inflection[diff_for_o_u]
Nouns_Obl[u_stem,-human] [:u] (([>:>] Inflection[-diff_for_o_u,-null_morphemes,-human]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Obl[o_stem,-human] [:o] (([>:>] Inflection[-diff_for_o_u,-null_morphemes,-human]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Obl[u_stem,human] [:u] (([>:>] Inflection[-diff_for_o_u,-null_morphemes,-nonhuman]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Obl[o_stem,human] [:o] (([>:>] Inflection[-diff_for_o_u,-null_morphemes,-nonhuman]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Pl
Nouns_Pl_Obl[i] [:i] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-human,-in]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Pl_Obl[no_vowel] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-human,-in]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))

Nouns_Pl_Obl[o] [:ui] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-human,-in]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Pl_Obl[r] [:re] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-human,-in_for_ij_stems]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes,-in_for_ij_stems]))

Nouns_Pl_Obl[consonant] [:a] (([>:>] Inflection[-null_morphemes,-human]) | (Inflection[null_morphemes]))
Nouns_Pl_Obl[-r] [:a] [>:>] Inflection[pl_a]


LEXICON Inflection

<erg>:v[nonhuman]
<erg>:s[human]
<gen>:ⁿ[diff_for_o_u,pl_a]
<dat>:n[diff_for_o_u]
<ins>:v
<cont>:x[pl_a]
<lat>:[null_morphemes]
<ad><lat>:gŏ
<inter><lat>:lŏ
<in><lat>:i[in]
<in><lat>:[in_for_ij_stems,null_morphemes]
<ess>:[null_morphemes]
<ad><ess>:go
<inter><ess>:lo
<in><ess>:i[in]
<in><ess>:[in_for_ij_stems,null_morphemes]
<abl>:reⁿ
<ad>><abl>:go>reⁿ
<inter>><abl>:lo>reⁿ
<in>><abl>:i>reⁿ[in]
<in><abl>:reⁿ[in_for_ij_stems]
<trans>:ğ
<ad>><trans>:go>ğ
<inter>><trans>:lo>ğ
<in>><trans>:i>ğ[in]
<in><trans>:ğ[in_for_ij_stems]
<term>:mciⁿ
<ad>><term>:go>mciⁿ
<inter>><term>:lo>mciⁿ
<in>><term>:i>mciⁿ
<in><term>:mciⁿ[in_for_ij_stems]
<apud><lat>:guiħ
<apud><ess>:ciⁿ
<apud><abl>:xiⁿ
